District of Columbia statutes.
50-1331.09

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter 1 of Chapter 15 of Title 2, shall make such regulations and establish such fees as in the Mayor’s judgment are necessary for the administration of this chapter. The Mayor may issue any rules or regulations or amend any existing rules or regulations or provisions of this chapter as needed to comply with the requirements of federal laws and regulations or with federal grant eligibility requirements.

History

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 109, 52 DCR 1700

Cross References

Alcoholic beverage control, operation of trains, streetcars, and other vehicles by intoxicated persons, see § 25-1009.